Arkansas, session 2025, SB634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-116. Division of Interscholastic Activities — Definitions —
Creation — Duties.
(a) To promote the value of student participation in interscholastic
activities and to provide fair and impartial oversight of interscholastic
activities at schools in the State of Arkansas, the General Assembly finds
that a Division of Interscholastic Activities should be established under the
direct operational control of the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Interscholastic activity" means a school activity not
included in a regular curriculum, including without limitation sports and
special interest clubs or groups, in which students in grades six through
twelve (6-12) participate and compete; and
*TNL064*
04/08/2025 7:24:37 PM TNL064

SB634
(2) "School" means:
(A) A public school;
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school; or
(C) A private school.
(c) There is created a Division of Interscholastic Activities within
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(d)(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
select an individual to serve as the Assistant Commissioner of the Division
of Interscholastic Activities, who shall serve at the pleasure of the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(2) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education may
reassign as necessary Division of Elementary and Secondary Education staff to
the Division of Interscholastic Activities sufficient to fulfill the Division
of Interscholastic Activities's monitoring and reporting obligations.
(e)(1) The person selected as Assistant Commissioner of the Division
of Interscholastic Activities shall:
(A) Be a person of good moral character and qualified
technically and by experience to direct the work of the Division of
Interscholastic Activities;
(B) Hold a master's degree or an equivalent degree from an
accredited institution; and
(C) Have at least ten (10) years of experience in an
administrative, supervisory, or management position.
(2) No person who is related within the fourth degree of
consanguinity or affinity to a member of the State Board of Education or to
the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall be eligible to
serve as the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Interscholastic
Activities.
(f) With guidance and approval from the Commissioner of Elementary and
Secondary Education, the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of
Interscholastic Activities shall be responsible for hiring all employees of
the Division of Interscholastic Activities.
(g) The Division of Interscholastic Activities shall have the
following responsibilities:
(1) To monitor schools for compliance with the following as it
relates to interscholastic activities:
04/08/2025 7:24:37 PM TNL064

SB634
(A) State rules and federal regulations;
(B) Legislative acts; and
(C) All rules as established by the state board;
(2) To promote the educational values inherent in
interscholastic activities that contribute to the accepted aims of education
while avoiding interference with the educational goals of a school;
(3) To ensure that interscholastic activities remain an integral
part of an education program;
(4) To promote an understanding that participation in
interscholastic activities is a privilege for students who meet certain
criteria established by the state board;
(5) To foster a cooperative spirit of good sportsmanship on the
part of school representatives, school patrons, and students;
(6) To support opportunities for students to experience the
benefits that are derived from teamwork, developing a sense of fair play, and
accomplishment;
(7) To promote an understanding and appreciation that rules,
consistently applied, create order and discipline;
(8) To provide standard and consistent interpretations of the
rules as adopted by the state board;
(9) To conduct championship events according to the procedures
adopted by the state board in a thorough and impartial manner;
(10) To prevent exploitation of youth by special interest
groups;
(11) To develop standards of officiating and adjudicating
interscholastic activities in order to ensure greater statewide consistency
and quality; and
(12) To consider the distances required for traveling when
scheduling competitions between schools.
(h)(1) Each public school and open-enrollment public charter school
shall be subject to the oversight of interscholastic activities by the
Division of Interscholastic Activities.
(2) A private school may choose to be subject to the oversight
of its interscholastic activities by the Division of Interscholastic
Activities.
(i) The Division of Interscholastic Activities shall not discriminate
04/08/2025 7:24:37 PM TNL064

SB634
against an individual on the basis of gender, national origin, race,
ethnicity, religion, or disability.
(j) By June 1 of each year, the Division of Interscholastic Activities
shall provide an annual report on its regulation of interscholastic
activities for the previous school year to the House Committee on Education
and the Senate Committee on Education.
(k) The state board shall promulgate rules to administer this section.





























04/08/2025 7:24:37 PM TNL064